sl-SI: Format dostave telefonske kartice: Digitalna koda (e-pošta); Fizična kartica; Natisljiv kupon; E-kupon (SMS); Drugo
lt-LT: Telefono kortelės pristatymo formatas: Skaitmeninis kodas (el. paštu); Fizinė kortelė; Spausdinamas kuponas; Elektroninis kuponas (SMS); Kita
vi: Định dạng cung cấp thẻ điện thoại: Mã số (email); Thẻ vật lý; Phiếu in được; eVoucher (SMS); Khác
ko: 전화카드 전달 형식: 디지털 코드(이메일); 실제 카드; 인쇄 가능한 바우처; e바우처(SMS); 기타
hu: Telefonkártya kézbesítési formátuma: Digitális kód (e-mail); Fizikai kártya; Nyomtatható utalvány; eUtalvány (SMS); Egyéb
it: Formato di consegna della scheda telefonica: Codice digitale (e-mail); Carta fisica; Buono stampabile; eVoucher (SMS); Altro
el: Μορφή παράδοσης τηλεφωνικής κάρτας: Ψηφιακός κωδικός (email); Φυσική κάρτα; Εκτυπώσιμο κουπόνι; Ηλεκτρονικό κουπόνι (SMS); Άλλο
nb: Leveringsformat for telefonkort: Digital kode (e-post); Fysisk kort; Utskrivbar kupong; eVoucher (SMS); Annet
ja: 電話カードの配送形式: デジタルコード (メール); 物理カード; 印刷可能なバウチャー; 電子バウチャー (SMS); その他
sv: Leveransformat för telefonkort: Digital kod (e-post); Fysiskt kort; Utskrivbar kupong; e-kupong (SMS); Övrigt
bg-BG: Формат за предоставяне на телефонна карта: Цифров код (имейл); Физическа карта; Ваучер за печат; eVoucher (SMS); Други
zh-CN: 电话卡交付形式: 数字码（电子邮件）; 实体卡; 可打印凭证; 电子凭证（短信）; 其他
fr: Format de livraison de la carte de téléphone: Code numérique (e-mail); Carte physique; Bon imprimable; eVoucher (SMS); Autre
tr: Telefon kartı teslimat formatı: Dijital kod (e-posta); Fiziksel kart; Yazdırılabilir kupon; eKupon (SMS); Diğer
en: Phone card delivery format: Digital code (email); Physical card; Printable voucher; eVoucher (SMS); Other
nl: Leveringsformaat voor telefoonkaarten: Digitale code (e-mail); Fysieke kaart; Afdrukbare voucher; eVoucher (SMS); Andere
fi: Puhelinkortin toimitusmuoto: Digitaalinen koodi (sähköposti); Fyysinen kortti; Tulostettava kuponki; eKuponki (tekstiviesti); Muu
pt-PT: Formato de entrega do cartão telefónico: Código digital (e-mail); Cartão físico; Voucher para impressão; eVoucher (SMS); Outro
ro-RO: Formatul de livrare a cartelei telefonice: Cod digital (e-mail); Card fizic; Voucher imprimabil; eVoucher (SMS); Altele
pt-BR: Formato de entrega do cartão de telefone: Código digital (e-mail); Disco físico; Voucher para impressão; eVoucher (SMS); Outro
ru: Формат доставки телефонной карты: Цифровой код (электронная почта); Физическая карта; Ваучер для печати; Электронный ваучер (SMS); Другой
hr-HR: Format isporuke telefonske kartice: Digitalni kod (e-pošta); Fizička kartica; Ispisivi vaučer; e-Vaučer (SMS); Ostalo
th: รูปแบบการจัดส่งบัตรโทรศัพท์: รหัสดิจิทัล (อีเมล); บัตรทางกายภาพ; บัตรกำนัลที่พิมพ์ได้; eVoucher (SMS); อื่นๆ
cs: Způsob dodání telefonní karty: Digitální kód (e-mailem); Fyzická karta; Tisknutelný voucher; Elektronický voucher (SMS); Jiné
zh-TW: 電話卡交付格式: 數位代碼 (電子郵件); 實體卡片; 可列印的兌換券; 電子兌換券 (簡訊); 其他
da: Leveringsformat for telefonkort: Digital kode (e-mail); Fysisk kort; Printbar kupon; e-kupon (SMS); Andet
de: Lieferformat für Telefonkarten: Digitaler Code (E-Mail); Physische Karte; Gutschein zum Ausdrucken; eVoucher (SMS); Sonstiges
es: Formato de entrega de tarjetas telefónicas: Código digital (correo electrónico); Tarjeta física; Cupón imprimible; eVoucher (SMS); Otros
sk-SK: Formát doručenia telefónnej karty: Digitálny kód (e-mail); Fyzická karta; Tlačiteľný poukaz; Elektronický poukaz (SMS); Iné
pl: Forma dostawy karty do telefonu: Kod cyfrowy (e-mail); Karta fizyczna; Kupon do wydruku; eVoucher (SMS); Inne